Washington statutes.
RCW 11.118.070

Appointment and removal of trustee.

If no trustee is designated or no designated trustee is willing or able to serve, the court shall name a trustee. The court may order the removal of an acting trustee and the transfer of the property to another trustee if it is necessary or appropriate in order to assure that the intended use is carried out. A court may also make such other orders and determinations as shall be advisable to carry out the intent of the trustor and the purpose of this chapter.

[ 2001 c 327 s 8.]